Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 2. Publication of Notice

Cross references. —

As to publication of notice of execution sale of goods and chattels, see §

1-17-312

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

58 Am. Jur. 2d Notice § 1 et seq.

66 C.J.S. Notice §§ 1 to 23.

§ 1-6-201.
Manner of publishing generally.

All notices by law directed,
authorized or permitted to be made by publication may be published
once each week during the period of time for which the notice is required
by law to be published. All such weekly publications made in a newspaper
issued more than once each week shall be published in the same issue
in each succeeding week for the required publication period.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 30, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 4431; C.S. 1920, § 5701; R.S. 1931, § 89-1057; C.S. 1945, § 4-101; W.S. 1957, § 1-49; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision that party against whom judgment or order was rendered based on service by publication may have the judgment or order opened and be allowed to defend within six months following date of entry, see §

1-16-402

.

As to publication of notice of hearing in connection with probate of wills, see §

2-4-206

.

As to publication of notice of merger of banks, see §

13-4-107

.

As to publication of notice to creditors in connection with liquidation of banks, see §

13-4-402

.

As to publication of ordinance, see §

15-1-116

.

As to publication of legal notices in newspapers by county commissioners, see §

18-3-519

.

As to publication of change in precinct boundaries, see §

22-7-102

.

As to publication of notice of bond elections, see §

22-21-104

.

As to publication of notice to bidders concerning contracts for road and bridge construction, see §

24-2-108

.

For provision requiring publication or posting of notice of location of roads or alterations, see §

24-3-110

.

For duty of state treasurer to publish notice of intention to issue and negotiate state highway bonds, see §

24-8-103

.

As to publication of notice of selection of public lands prior to sale or lease thereof, see §

36-3-104

.

As to publication and contents of notice with reference to sale of state lands, see §

36-9-104

.

As to publication of notice for bids in connection with construction work in power districts, see §

37-7-128

.

As to publication of notice with reference to collection of delinquent sales taxes, see §

39-13-108

.

As to publication of notice of proposed changes in boundary of water conservancy district, see §§

41-3-751

and

41-3-752

.

As to publication of notice in connection with bond elections in water conservancy districts, see §

41-3-755

.

As to publication of notice of elections of district advisory board in underground water districts declared critical areas, see §

41-3-913

.

As to publication of notice of hearing as to adjudication of underground waters in critical areas, see §

41-3-914

.

As to publication of notice of hearing in connection with granting permit for construction of well, see §

41-3-932

.

As to publication of notice of election to change public irrigation and power districts to irrigation districts, see §

41-7-832

.

As to notice of hearings to organize drainage districts, see §§

41-9-104

and

41-9-105

.

As to publication of notice of hearing on dissolution of drainage district, see §

41-9-605

.

As to service by publication, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Jurisdiction, upon service by publication upon nonresident, of suit for establishment or enforcement of trust in respect of real property within the state, 15 ALR2d 610.

Sufficiency of affidavit as to due diligence in attempting to learn whereabouts of party to litigation for the purpose of obtaining service by publication, 21 ALR2d 929.

Validity of legislation relating to publication of legal notices, 26 ALR2d 655.

Difference between date of affidavit for service by publication and date of filing or of order for publication as affecting validity of service, 46 ALR2d 1364.

Sufficiency of affidavit made by attorney or other person on behalf of plaintiff for the purpose of service by publication, 47 ALR2d 423.

Newspapers within statutes as to publication of notices for resale of repossessed property by conditional vendors, 49 ALR2d 15.

Service on nonresident of notice of proceeding for modification of decree for alimony by publication or other form of constructive service, 62 ALR2d 544.

Service of process by publication in involuntary bankruptcy proceeding, 83 ALR2d 703.

Jurisdiction on service by publication in suit for divorce or alimony to reach property within state, 10 ALR3d 212.

Jurisdiction on constructive or substituted service, in divorce or alimony action, to reach property within state, 10 ALR3d 212.

What constitutes newspaper of “general circulation” within meaning of state statutes requiring publication of official notices and the like in such newspaper, 24 ALR4th 822.

§ 1-6-202.
Notice for certain number of days.

Whenever the law requires
or permits the publication of a notice for a certain number of days
prior to any action, unless otherwise provided by law the publication
may be made weekly as provided in W.S.

1-6-201

, and as often as such weekly publication can be made
during the period of time for which such publication is required by
law to be made, the first publication to be made as many days prior
to such action as the law requires.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 30, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 4432; C.S. 1920, § 5702; R.S. 1931, § 89-1058; C.S. 1945, § 4-102; W.S. 1957, § 1-50; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 1-6-203.
Notice for specified number of weeks.

In all cases where under
the laws a notice is required or permitted to be published for a specified
number of weeks, it is sufficient that the publication be made once
each week for the number of issues corresponding to the number of
weeks for which such publication is required to be made, provided
that not more than twenty (20) days shall intervene between the date
of the last publication and the time set for the intended action.
In no case shall the notice given for a longer time than required
by law be held defective for that reason.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 30, §§ 3, 4; C.S. 1910, § 4433; C.S. 1920, § 5703; R.S. 1931, § 89-1059; Laws 1943, ch. 95, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 4-103; W.S. 1957, § 1-51; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 1-6-204.
Publication of real property; descriptions used.

All notices directed,
authorized or permitted to be made by publication that require a legal
description of real property on the notice shall include the street
address for the property used by the United States postal service
when available, or the street address used by the county or municipality
if available.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 70, § 1.